Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.163

Purchase of service credit—Service at Washington State University.

Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, employees of Washington State University who first established membership in the public employees' retirement system plan 1 under *RCW 41.40.500 through 41.40.507, as existing on July 28, 1991, and **RCW 41.40.508, as existing on June 7, 1990, may purchase, as set forth under RCW 41.50.165, plan 1 service credit for the period of service at Washington State University prior to his or her contributory membership in the Washington State University retirement system.

[ 1998 c 17 s 4.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) RCW 41.40.500 through 41.40.507 were decodified pursuant to 1991 c 35 s 4.

**(2) RCW 41.40.508 was repealed by 1990 c 249 s 22.